Oklahoma, session 2025, SB848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 18-104.1 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Independent Education Act”. In accordance with the Tenth Amendment


to the United States Constitution, the Legislature finds it


necessary to protect the values, funding, and independence of public

Req. No. 50 Page 1


schools, students, parents, and taxpayers in this state. The


purpose of this act is to ensure that no public school in this state


may be compelled by threat of defunding to establish policies that


are not in line with the purpose of public schools, which is to


prepare students with knowledge which will help them perform well in


society and the workplace by having fundamental skills in reading,


writing, mathematics, observable science, and primary-sourced


history and government.


B. 1. No school district or public charter school in this


state shall use, or be forced to use through intimidation or threat


by the United States Department of Education, private, state, or


federal funds to develop, organize, administer, engage in, promote,


or endorse any activity including any event, initiative, official


communication, social media post, educational program, or public


campaign, that aims to promote or recognize sexual orientation or


gender identity.


2. For the purposes of this section:


a. “gender identity” means a person’s innate sense of


gender, chiefly used in contexts where it is


contrasted with the biological sex of the person at


birth, and


b. “sexual orientation” means a person’s identity in


relation to the gender or genders to which the person


is sexually attracted.

Req. No. 50 Page 2


C. The State Department of Education and the State Board of


Education shall develop a plan to phase out the acceptance and use


of funds provided by the federal government for the support of pre-


kindergarten through twelfth grade education in this state and


replace those funds with state funds. The plan shall include but


not be limited to a proposed timeline for phasing out acceptance and


use of federal funds, the projected need for state or local funds to


replace the federal funds, and the reasons for the need to phase out


the federal funds. The plan shall be submitted to the Governor, the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives. The Legislature may adopt the plan through passage


of legislation approved by a majority of the Senate and House of


Representatives and signed by the Governor.


D. 1. The Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,


and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall form a working


group to monitor implementation of the provisions of this act. The


working group shall be comprised of:


a. the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee and


one other member of the Senate, appointed by the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate,


b. the chair of the House Appropriations and Budget


Committee and one other member of the House of


Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House


of Representatives, and

Req. No. 50 Page 3


c. one member appointed by the Governor, who shall serve


as chair of the working group.


2. Appointments to the working group shall be made within


thirty (30) days after the effective date of this act. Members of


the working group shall receive no compensation or travel


reimbursement, except legislative members who shall be reimbursed


for necessary travel expenses in accordance with the provisions of


Section 456 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


3. The working group shall not be subject to the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act or the Oklahoma Open Records Act.


4. The State Department of Education shall provide staff and


administrative support for the working group.


5. The working group shall submit a report of its findings and


recommendations to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the


Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-50 EB 1/19/2025 5:44:34 AM





Req. No. 50 Page 4